Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6906
Economic redevelopment area, defined.

Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of Nebraska in which:

(1) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period; and

(2) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more for the federal census tract in the area.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB355, § 5.